North Dakota statutes. TITLE 5 Alcoholic Beverages
Note.

Section 33 of chapter 80 of the 1967 Session Laws repealed title 5 of the North Dakota Century Code. This section specifies that the provisions of chapter 80 shall replace the provisions of title 5 of the North Dakota Century Code. Therefore the provisions of chapter 80 of the 1967 Session Laws have been placed in title 5 of the North Dakota Century Code and supersede any of the provisions of title 5 which were in effect prior to July 1, 1967.